Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.112

Private law enforcement off-duty employment—Guidelines.

Washington state patrol officers may engage in private law enforcement off-duty employment, in uniform or in plainclothes for private benefit, subject to guidelines adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol. These guidelines must ensure that the integrity and professionalism of the Washington state patrol is preserved. Use of Washington state patrol officer's uniforms shall be considered de minimis use of state property.

[ 2005 c 124 s 1; 1997 c 375 s 1.]